RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/lt_LT.aff
SFX Q jis     jausiąja        jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiojoj       jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiojoje      jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiosioms     jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiąsias      jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiosiomis    jis       
SFX Q jis     jausiosiose     jis       
SFX Q jas     jausio          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiam         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausią          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiu          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiame        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausi           jas       
SFX Q jas     jausių          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiems        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausius         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiais        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiuose       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausia          jas       
SFX Q jas     jausios         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiai         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausioje        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausioms        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausias         jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiomis       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiose        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiasis       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiojo        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiajam       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiąjį        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiuoju       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiajame      jas       
SFX Q jas     jausieji        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiųjų        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiesiems     jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiuosius     jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiaisiais    jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiuosiuose   jas       
SFX Q jas     jausioji        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiosios      jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiajai       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiąją        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiąja        jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiojoj       jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiojoje      jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiosioms     jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiąsias      jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiosiomis    jas       
SFX Q jas     jausiosiose     jas       
SFX Q jus     jausio          jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiam         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausią          jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiu          jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiame        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausi           jus       
SFX Q jus     jausių          jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiems        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausius         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiais        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiuose       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausia          jus       
SFX Q jus     jausios         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiai         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausioje        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausioms        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausias         jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiomis       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiose        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiasis       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiojo        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiajam       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiąjį        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiuoju       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiajame      jus       
SFX Q jus     jausieji        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiųjų        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiesiems     jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiuosius     jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiaisiais    jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiuosiuose   jus       
SFX Q jus     jausioji        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiosios      jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiajai       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiąją        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiąja        jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiojoj       jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiojoje      jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiosioms     jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiąsias      jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiosiomis    jus       
SFX Q jus     jausiosiose     jus       
SFX Q tis     čiausio         tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiam        tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausią         tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiu         tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiame       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausi          tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausių         tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiems       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausius        tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiais       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiuose      tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausia         tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausios        tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiai        tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausioje       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausioms       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausias        tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiomis      tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiose       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiasis      tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiojo       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiajam      tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiąjį       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiuoju      tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiajame     tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausieji       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiųjų       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiesiems    tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiuosius    tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiaisiais   tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiuosiuose  tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausioji       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiosios     tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiajai      tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiąją       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiąja       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiojoj      tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiojoje     tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiosioms    tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiąsias     tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiosiomis   tis       
SFX Q tis     čiausiosiose    tis       
SFX Q tas     čiausio         tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiam        tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausią         tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiu         tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiame       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausi          tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausių         tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiems       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausius        tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiais       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiuose      tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausia         tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausios        tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiai        tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausioje       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausioms       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausias        tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiomis      tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiose       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiasis      tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiojo       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiajam      tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiąjį       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiuoju      tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiajame     tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausieji       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiųjų       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiesiems    tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiuosius    tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiaisiais   tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiuosiuose  tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausioji       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiosios     tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiajai      tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiąją       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiąja       tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiojoj      tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiojoje     tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiosioms    tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiąsias     tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiosiomis   tas       
SFX Q tas     čiausiosiose    tas       
SFX Q tus     čiausio         tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausiam        tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausią         tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausiu         tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausiame       tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausi          tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausių         tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausiems       tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausius        tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausiais       tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausiuose      tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausia         tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausios        tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausiai        tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausioje       tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausioms       tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausias        tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausiomis      tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausiose       tus       
SFX Q tus     čiausiasis      tus       
