RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/lt_LT.dic
adaptyvus/ANQ
aiļæ½kus/ANQ
akivaizdus/ANQ
aktyvus/ANQ
aliejuotas/ANQ
amaruotas/ANQ
anekdotiļæ½kas/ANQ
ankstokas/ANQ
antisemitiļæ½kas/ANQ
apetitiļæ½kas/ANQ
apkantus/ANQ
apstus/ANQ
apļæ½valgus/ANQ
artus/ANQ
ļæ½sotas/ANQ
atgajus/ANQ
atkilas/ANQ
atmainus/ANQ
atļæ½akus/ANQ
atstangus/ANQ
audringas/ANQ
auksuotas/ANQ
badus/ANQ
balsus/ANQ
barningas/ANQ
baugus/ANQ
beprasmiļæ½kas/ANQ
besotiļæ½kas/ANQ
bylus/ANQ
blyļæ½kus/ANQ
brankus/ANQ
bruzgus/ANQ
burgariļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½iauļæ½kus/ANQ
cukruotas/ANQ
dairus/ANQ
darbininkiļæ½kas/ANQ
darļæ½iļæ½kas/ANQ
debesingas/ANQ
delikatus/ANQ
dervingas/ANQ
despotiļæ½kas/ANQ
didus/ANQ
dinamiļæ½kas/ANQ
diskursiļæ½kas/ANQ
doras/ANQ
dramblotas/ANQ
drausmingas/ANQ
drikus/ANQ
drungnas/ANQ
duburiuotas/ANQ
dļæ½lus/ANQ
duonuotas/ANQ
dvasiļæ½kas/ANQ
dvisus/ANQ
ļæ½daluotas/ANQ
eiklus/ANQ
ekspresyvus/ANQ
elastiļæ½kas/ANQ
entuziastingas/ANQ
ļæ½ringa/ANQ
europietiļæ½kas/AQ
fariziejiļæ½kas/ANQ
fonetiļæ½kas/ANQ
gailingas/ANQ
gaivingas/ANQ
galvingas/ANQ
garbus/ANQ
gaļæ½lus/ANQ
gedulingas/ANQ
gelsvas/ANQ
geranoriļæ½kas/ANQ
gilus/ANQ
giringas/ANQ
gyvingas/ANQ
gleivļæ½tas/ANQ
glļæ½dus/ANQ
grabļæ½tus/ANQ
gramozdiļæ½kas/ANQ
greitas/ANQ
grieļæ½tas/ANQ
grynas/ANQ
grļæ½duotas/ANQ
gulsļæ½ias/ANQ
harmoningas/ANQ
idļæ½jiļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½gimtas/ANQ
ikvienas/ANQ
iliustratyvus/ANQ
imunus/ANQ
inkļæ½tiruotas/ANQ
intravertiļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½sakmus/ANQ
iļæ½dubas/ANQ
iļæ½kalbus/ANQ
iļæ½laidingas/ANQ
iļæ½oriļæ½kas/ANQ
iļæ½sklidus/ANQ
isteriļæ½kas/ANQ
iļæ½ļæ½argas/ANQ
ļæ½tartinas/ANQ
ļæ½vaizdus/ANQ
iļæ½us/ANQ
jaunas/ANQ
jovaluotas/ANQ
juostuotas/ANQ
kabus/ANQ
kaitus/ANQ
kalningas/ANQ
kalvus/ANQ
kanceliariļæ½kas/ANQ
karaliļæ½kas/ANQ
karļæ½tas/ANQ
kaspinuotas/ANQ
kazuistiļæ½kas/ANQ
keliaklupsļæ½ias/ANQ
kemsuotas/ANQ
kertuotas/ANQ
keturļæ½akas/ANQ
kietas/ANQ
kilus/ANQ
kitoniļæ½kas/ANQ
klastingas/ANQ
klibas/ANQ
klļæ½psļæ½ias/ANQ
knibus/ANQ
kolektyviļæ½kas/ANQ
komunikabilus/ANQ
konspiratyvus/ANQ
korumpuotas/ANQ
krapļæ½tus/ANQ
kreiduotas/ANQ
krienuotas/ANQ
krovus/ANQ
kļæ½das/ANQ
kunigiļæ½kas/ANQ
kurļæ½ias/ADNQ
kvailas/ANQ
laibas/ANQ
laipsniuotas/ANQ
lakingas/ANQ
lankiļæ½kas/ANQ
lavoniļæ½kas/ANQ
leistinas/ANQ
lepļæ½iļæ½kas/ANQ
liekas/ANQ
lietuviļæ½kas/ANQ
lipingas/ANQ
liurbiļæ½kas/ANQ
lyriļæ½kas/ANQ
lomotas/ANQ
lļæ½ļæ½us/ANQ
makaroniļæ½kas/ANQ
manevringas/ANQ
markus/ANQ
mļæ½slus/ANQ
mauruotas/ANQ
medingas/ANQ
meistriļæ½kas/ANQ
melsvas/ANQ
mļæ½siļæ½kas/ANQ
metodiļæ½kas/ANQ
miltiļæ½kas/ANQ
mistiļæ½kas/ANQ
monolitiļæ½kas/ANQ
mļæ½suotas/ANQ
natļæ½ralistiļæ½kas/ANQ
negatyvus/ANQ
nelemtas/ANQ
nepamainomas/ANQ
netikļæ½tas/ANQ
nirtingas/ANQ
nuliekamas/ANQ
nuolaidus/ANQ
nuoļæ½ambus/ANQ
oranļæ½iļæ½kas/ANQ
pagarbus/ANQ
pairas/ANQ
pakrikas/ANQ
panevļæ½ļæ½ietiļæ½kas/ANQ
parļæ½gotas/ANQ
pasiturintis/ANQ
pastiras/ANQ
pavalgus/ANQ
paļæ½odiļæ½kas/ANQ
perifrastiļæ½kas/ANQ
pienuotas/ANQ
pilvingas/ANQ
platokas/ANQ
plyļæ½iuotas/ANQ
poringas/ANQ
prakilnus/ANQ
prastokas/ANQ
prieinamas/ANQ
prieveiksmiļæ½kas/ANQ
privalus/ANQ
provizoriļæ½kas/ANQ
purļæ½tas/ANQ
puvus/ANQ
raiļæ½us/ANQ
raudulingas/ANQ
regus/ANQ
reprezentatyvus/ANQ
rimtas/ANQ
rojiļæ½kas/ANQ
rumuniļæ½kas/AQ
sagotas/ANQ
ļæ½alimas/ANQ
sankabus/ANQ
satyriļæ½kas/ANQ
savigarbus/ANQ
ļæ½eimininkiļæ½kas/ANQ
senoviļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½iandieniļæ½kas/ANQ
sidabruotas/ANQ
simboliļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½iugļæ½dus/ANQ
skaitlingas/ANQ
skeptiļæ½kas/ANQ
skliausļæ½ias/ANQ
skubrus/ANQ
slenksļæ½iuotas/ANQ
slļæ½gus/ANQ
smļæ½liļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½nairas/ANQ
solidus/ANQ
spinduliuotas/ANQ
spļæ½dus/ANQ
stacionarus/ANQ
sterilus/ANQ
striukas/ANQ
sultingas/ANQ
suļæ½nekamas/ANQ
ļæ½varus/ANQ
svetingas/ANQ
takus/ANQ
tarmiļæ½kas/ANQ
techniļæ½kas/ANQ
teplus/ANQ
tikslingas/ANQ
tykus/ANQ
traknus/ANQ
trinytas/ANQ
trupiniuotas/ANQ
tļæ½ļæ½mingas/ANQ
ļæ½kininkiļæ½kas/ANQ
uolļæ½tas/ANQ
utilitarus/ANQ
vabzdļæ½ialesys/ANQ
vaistingas/ANQ
valyvas/ANQ
vargus/ANQ
vasariļæ½kas/ANQ
veikus/ANQ
vļæ½plas/ANQ
verstas/ANQ
viļæ½vienas/ANQ
vienlinkas/ANQ
vilningas/ANQ
virļæ½uļæ½iausias/ANQ
vyrus/ANQ
ļæ½aibingas/ANQ
ļæ½argoniļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½ļæ½rutingas/ANQ
ļæ½inybiļæ½kas/ANQ
ļæ½nairas/ANQ
ļæ½vangus/ANQ
